Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 8. Prohibited Acts.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.09.850.
Unlicensed retail sale.

A person commits the crime of unlicensed retail sale if the person knowingly operates without the appropriate license a retail operation that requires a license under this chapter.

Unlicensed retail sale is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 8 SLA 2022)